Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-363
Officers and employees; salaries.

The board of supervisors, except where otherwise provided, shall, by resolution, at the time of hiring or appointing, provide for the compensation for work done and necessary expenses incurred by any officer, engineer, attorney, or other employee, and shall also pay the fees of all court and county officers who may by virtue of sections 31-301 to 31-369 render service to the district.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 31, p. 632;

Laws 1909, c. 147, § 12, p. 524;

R.S.1913, § 1858;

C.S.1922, § 1805;

C.S.1929, § 31-462;

R.S.1943, § 31-363.

County is entitled to retain, as a part of its general fund, fees fixed by statute for all taxes and special assessments collected by county treasurer for drainage district. Nemaha Valley Drainage District No. 2 of Nemaha County v. Nemaha County, 100 Neb. 64, 158 N.W. 438 (1916).